Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB327.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 26, 1978 (P.L.1375, No.325), known as the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 9.1. Issuance of and conditions for continuous maintenance permits.(a) The department shall develop a continuous maintenance permit for which the Department of Transportation or a municipality may apply. The permit shall allow permittees to maintain, inspect and monitor watercourses, water obstructions, appurtenant works and encroachments as specified within the 1234567891011121314151617181920 permit.(b) The department shall approve an application for a permit to an applicant under this section if the applicant meets all of the following criteria:(1) The applicant is without a sustained history of significant permit violations under this act.(2) The applicant takes an affirmative duty over the watercourses, water obstructions, appurtenant works and encroachments delineated in the permit application.(c) Submission of a watercourse alone within the application shall be interpreted as submitting the publicly owned water obstructions, appurtenant works or encroachments within and alongside the watercourse unless otherwise specified within the permit.(d) A permittee may amend the permit through the addition of watercourses, water obstructions, appurtenant works or encroachments for which a duty to maintain, inspect and monitor shall apply with the approval of the department. The department shall approve a request to remove watercourses, water obstructions, appurtenant works or encroachments from the permit when a written order to do so is provided by the permittee . (e) A permittee may not be required to seek preapproval or further authorization from the department for maintenance conducted under the permit.(f) The permit shall provide for the maintenance, inspection and monitoring of watercourses, water obstructions, appurtenant works and encroachments in a manner consistent with previously prepared applicable plans, specifications, reports and designs for the operation of any category of watercourses, water obstructions, appurtenant works or encroachments prepared, 20250HB0327PN0282 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 signed and certified by a registered professional engineer and affixed with the seal of a registered professional engineer.(g) A permittee shall provide to the department, by January 15 of each year, a compilation of the maintenance projects undertaken between January 1 and December 31 of the previous year that were permitted under this section. The compilation shall delineate the persons, equipment operators and contractors operating as agents of the permittee who maintained, inspected and monitored watercourses, water obstructions, appurtenant works and encroachments.(h) A permit granted under this section by the department to a permittee shall be in effect for no less than 10 years. (i) The department shall extend a permit under this section to a permittee for 10 years following 10 years of operation under this section without a permit violation. A permit violation shall be found to have occurred when the permittee failed to address an alleged violation in the manner prescribed by the department within one year of receipt of the notice of an alleged permit violation.(j) A permit violation shall not be found to have occurred when a permittee removes or manipulates obstructions or debris within or along a watercourse in a manner that enables water obstructions, appurtenant works or encroachments specified within the permit to operate consistent with applicable plans, specifications, reports and designs previously prepared by a registered professional engineer.(k) The permittee shall accept an affirmative duty to maintain, inspect and monitor watercourses, water obstructions, appurtenant works and encroachments as specified within the permit.20250HB0327PN0282 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (l) As used in this section, the term "municipality" means a county, city, town, borough, township or school district in this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0327PN0282 - 4 - 1234